Tennessee, session 114, HB0806.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1351, is amended by deleting
"handgun" wherever it appears and substituting "firearm" and by deleting "handguns" wherever
it appears and substituting "firearms".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1351(r)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) A facially valid handgun permit, firearms permit, weapons permit, or license
issued by another state shall be valid in this state according to its terms and shall be
treated as if it is a firearm carry permit issued by this state.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1365, is amended by deleting
"handgun" wherever it appears and substituting "firearm".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1366, is amended by deleting
"handgun" wherever it appears and substituting "firearm" and by deleting "handguns" wherever
it appears and substituting "firearms".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-504(a)(2)(A), is amended by
deleting "handgun carry permit" and substituting "firearm carry permit" and by deleting "handgun
carry permits" and substituting "firearm carry permits".
HB0806
002123
- 1 -

SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-504(o), is amended by deleting
"handgun carry permit" wherever it appears and substituting "firearm carry permit" and by
deleting "handgun permit holder" and substituting "firearm carry permit holder".
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 33-6-413(b), is amended by deleting
"handgun carry permit" wherever it appears and substituting "firearm carry permit".
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-3-626, is amended by deleting
"handgun" wherever it appears and substituting "firearm" and by deleting "as defined in § 39-17-
1319" and substituting "as defined in § 39-11-106".
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-153(a)(6), is amended by
deleting "handgun carry permit" and substituting "firearm carry permit".
SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 38-3-122(c), is amended by
deleting "handgun carry permit" wherever it appears and substituting "firearm carry permit".
SECTION 11. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 38-6-105, is amended by deleting
"handgun permit" and substituting "firearm carry permit".
SECTION 12. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 38-8-116, is amended by deleting
"handgun carry permit" wherever it appears and substituting "firearm carry permit".
SECTION 13. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-16-702(b), is amended by
deleting "handgun carry permit" wherever it appears and substituting "firearm carry permit".
SECTION 14. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1309(e)(8)(B), is amended by
deleting "handgun carry permit" and substituting "firearm carry permit".
SECTION 15. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1313(a), is amended by
deleting "handgun carry permit" wherever it appears and substituting "firearm carry permit".
SECTION 16. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1321(a), is amended by
deleting "handgun" and substituting "firearm".
- 2 - 002123

SECTION 17. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1321(c)(2), is amended by
deleting "handgun permit" and substituting "firearm carry permit".
SECTION 18. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1350(g), is amended by
deleting "handgun" wherever it appears and substituting "firearm".
SECTION 19. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1352, is amended by deleting
"handgun" wherever it appears and substituting "firearm".
SECTION 20. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1359(g)(1), is amended by
deleting "handgun carry permit" wherever it appears and substituting "firearm carry permit".
SECTION 21. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-32-101, is amended by deleting
"handgun carry permit" wherever it appears and substituting "firearm carry permit".
SECTION 22. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-32-105(i)(5), is amended by
deleting "handgun carry permit" and substituting "firearm carry permit".
SECTION 23. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-815(b)(1)(A), is amended by
deleting "handgun carry permit" and substituting "firearm carry permit".
SECTION 24. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-816, is amended by deleting
"handgun carry permit" wherever it appears and substituting "firearm carry permit".
SECTION 25. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-7-161(b)(2), is amended by
deleting "handgun carry permit" and substituting "firearm carry permit".
SECTION 26. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-50-803(b)(2), is amended by
deleting "handgun carry permit" and substituting "firearm carry permit".
SECTION 27. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-3-201(d), is amended by
deleting "handgun permits to carry a handgun" and substituting "firearm carry permits to carry a
firearm".
SECTION 28. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-1-312(a)(1), is amended by
deleting "handgun carry permit" and substituting "firearm carry permit".
- 3 - 002123

SECTION 29. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 70-2-104(g)(3)(B), is amended by
deleting "handgun carry permit" wherever it appears and substituting "firearm carry permit".
SECTION 30. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 70-5-101(c), is amended by
deleting "handgun" wherever it appears and substituting "firearm".
SECTION 31. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 70-5-101(d), is amended by
deleting "hand gun" and substituting "firearm".
SECTION 32. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-21-401(f)(1), is amended by
deleting "handgun permits" and substituting "firearm carry permits".
SECTION 33. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-7-110(a), is amended by deleting
the language "handgun permit" and substituting "firearm carry permit".
SECTION 34. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-1-212, is amended by deleting
the language "handgun permit" and substituting "firearm carry permit".
SECTION 35. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-1-1441(c)(1), is amended by
deleting the language "handgun permit" and substituting "firearm carry permit".
SECTION 36. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-102-403(a)(2), is amended by
deleting the language "handgun permit" and substituting "firearm carry permit".
SECTION 37. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1351, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(z) Beginning July 1, 2025, at 12:01 a.m., all valid permits issued prior to that
date pursuant to this section are deemed to be enhanced firearm carry permits and the
department is not required to reissue permits.
SECTION 38. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1366, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
- 4 - 002123

(p) Beginning July 1, 2025, at 12:01 a.m., all valid permits issued prior to that
date pursuant to this section are deemed to be concealed firearm carry permits and the
department is not required to reissue permits.
SECTION 39. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, at 12:01 a.m., the public welfare
requiring it.
- 5 - 002123